Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1761.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; HMONG CULTURAL CENTER OF MINNESOTA.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Hmong Cultural Center of Minnesota, Inc., a 501(c)(3) nonprofit corporation, to predesign, design, construct, renovate, furnish, and equip a building in the city of St. Paul to provide programming and resources to celebrate Hmong culture and enhance cross-cultural awareness. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end